Utah statutes.
7-2-8.   Special deputies or agents -- Appointment -- Bond.

The commissioner may appoint one or more special deputies or agents to assist him in the proceedings. The commissioner may fix the compensation of any agent appointed to assist him. The commissioner may require from agents security for the faithful discharge of their duties. All bonds given under this section shall be deposited with the commissioner and kept in his office.



Enacted by Chapter 8, 1983 General Session

